Mississippi, session 2026, SB2260.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  There is hereby established the "Mississippi Health and Welfare Efficiency Task Force" created to examine the efficiency of certain state agencies, streamline government and regulatory services and eliminate duplicative requirements and procedures which unnecessarily slow down the process for Mississippians to receive government services.  The task force shall develop recommendations to the Legislature on changes to policy and laws in Mississippi with a goal of increasing state government efficiency by streamlining government and regulatory services and eliminating duplicate procedures and requirements. (2)  The members of the task force shall be as follows: (a)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Division of Medicaid, or his or her designee; (b)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Human Services, or his or her designee; (c)  The Commissioner of the Mississippi Department of Child Protective Services, or his or her designee; (d)  The State Health Officer of the Mississippi Department of Health, or his or her designee; (e)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Mental Health, or his or her designee; (f)  Three (3) senators appointed by the Lieutenant Governor; (g)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Rehabilitation Services, or his or her designee; (h)  Three (3) representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; (i)  The Attorney General, or his or her designee; and (j)  The Governor, or his or her designee. (3)  The task force shall meet within forty-five (45) days of the effective date of this act and shall evaluate the current data, resources, laws and policies of the State of Mississippi.  Specifically, the task force shall: (a)  Examine the efficiency of the state agencies represented by membership on the task force; (b)  Review current laws, regulations, rules and procedures and provide recommendations regarding how to streamline government and regulatory services provided by the state agencies represented by membership on the task force; (c)  Provide recommendations on how to eliminate duplicative requirements and procedures which unnecessarily slow down the process for Mississippians to receive government and regulatory services that are provided by the state agencies represented by membership on the task force; and (d)  Discuss any information deemed related and necessary to accomplish the tasks assigned in paragraphs (a) through (c) of this subsection. (4)  To effectuate the purposes of this act, any department, division, board, bureau, committee, institution or agency of the state, or any political subdivision thereof, shall, at the request of the task force, provide the facilities, assistance, information and data needed to enable the task force to carry out its duties. (5)  The State Health Officer shall call the first meeting and shall serve as the chair of the task force.  The members of the task force shall elect a vice chairman, and any other officers determined to be necessary, from among the members at its first meeting.  The task force shall develop and report its findings and recommendations to the Mississippi Legislature on or before December 1, 2026. A majority of the membership shall be required to approve any final report and recommendation.  Meetings of the task force shall be held at the State Capitol; however, if it is not feasible for the task force to hold an in-person meeting, the task force may convene utilizing an online meeting platform that is accessible for viewing by the public. (6)  The Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review shall provide necessary clerical support for the meetings of the task force and the preparation of the report. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.